Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-675
Truck-tractor, defined.

Truck-tractor shall mean any motor vehicle designed and primarily used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 171.

The classification of a vehicle as a truck-tractor under this section, is not changed by the addition of a box to the vehicle if the design and primary use of the vehicle is to draw other vehicles, and any load carried by the truck-tractor, other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and the load so drawn, is merely incidental to its primary use. State v. Speicher & Herrick, 203 Neb. 535, 279 N.W.2d 162 (1979).